src/fst/phonology-old.xfscript
! This file is a script for the Xerox xfst interface.
! It gives the morphophonological rules for Nenets.


! In this file, testcases are marked as follows:

! space exclmark euro space upper:lower
! Please add tests for eventual new rules or problems

! To test: in kt/mrj/src, do:
! xfst -e "source xfst-mrj.txt"
! 
! save s
! quit
! cat xfst-mrj.txt | grep €|cut -d" " -f3|cut -d":" -f1|lookup s


clear stack


! Definition section !
! ================== !

echo << THE DEFININTIONS >>

define Cns [ б | в | г | д | ж | з 
           | Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З 
           | й | к | л | м | н | п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц 
           | Й | К | Л | М | Н | П | Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц 
           | ч | ш | щ 
           | Ч | Ш | Щ ] ;

define BackVws [ а | ы | ё | о | у | ю | я
               | А | Ы | Ё | О | У | Ю | Я ] ;

define FrontVws [ ӓ | э | е | и | ӹ | ӱ
                | Ӓ | Э | Е | И | Ӹ | Ӱ ] ;

define Vws [ BackVws | FrontVws ] ;


define Dummy %> ;



! Rule section !
! ============ !

echo << THE RULES >>

define RemoveStress [ • -> 0 || _ ] ;

define VowelHarmonyAÄ [ А1 -> а || BackVws  Cns* %> л _ ,,
                        А1 -> а || BackVws  Cns* %> _ ш ,,
                        А1 -> ӓ || FrontVws Cns* %> л _ ,,
                        А1 -> ӓ || FrontVws Cns* %> _ ш  ] ;

define MorphInitialYToZero [ Ы1 -> 0 ||  [ Vws | Ы1 ] %>  _ ]   ;

define MorphFinalYToE [ Ы1 -> ӹ || FrontVws Cns* %> ( Ы1 )[ ж | ш | ш т | ш к ] _ ,,
                       Ы1 -> ы || BackVws Cns* %> ( Ы1 ) [ ж | ш | ш т | ш к ] _ ,,
                       Ы1 -> ӹ || FrontVws Cns* %> _ [ ж | ш | ш т | ш к | н ] ,,
                       Ы1 -> ы || BackVws Cns* %> _ [ ж | ш | ш т | ш к | н ]  ];
 !€ ӓвӓ>жЫ1:ӓвӓжӹ

define VowelPalatalization [ а -> я , у -> ю || й %> _ ] ;

define jLoss й -> 0 || _ %> [ я | ю ] ;


define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;



read regex [

    RemoveStress
.o. VowelHarmonyAÄ
.o. MorphInitialYToZero
.o. MorphFinalYToE
.o. VowelPalatalization
.o. jLoss
.o. DummyDeletion
] ;
